New York, session 2025-2026, S4771.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 856 of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Each agency established to benefit a municipality which is not a 4 county, which is located wholly within a county which has an agency 5 established to benefit such county, shall charge the same fees as the 6 agency established to benefit the county in which the municipality is 7 located and shall not charge any fees besides those which are charged by 8 the agency established to benefit the county in which the municipality 9 is located. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law and shall apply to projects for which applications 12 were submitted on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08772-01-5